Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2650.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "tax benefit" in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Tax benefit." For purposes of this article, a tax benefit authorized under any of the following:(1) Article XVII-A.(2) Article XVIII-C.(3) Article XIX-B.(4) Article XIX-D.(5) Article XXIX-C.(6) Article XXIX-D.(6.1) Article XXIX-D.1.(7) The act of October 6, 1998 (P.L.705, No.92), known as the Keystone Opportunity Zone, Keystone Opportunity Expansion Zone and Keystone Opportunity Improvement Zone Act.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2902-D. Certification prohibition.The department may not certify any computer data center under this article after the effective date of this section.Section 3. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XXIX-D.1GOVERNOR'S RESPONSIBLE INFRASTRUCTUREDEVELOPMENT CERTIFICATION AND STANDARDSSection 2901-D.1. Scope of article.This article relates to the Governor's Responsible Infrastructure Development (GRID) Certification and Standards.Section 2902-D.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20260HB2650PN3683 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Alternative compliance payment." A per-megawatt-hour payment at the alternative compliance payment rate made to PEDA by a computer data center if the computer data center elects to satisfy its clean firm energy procurement requirement under section 2903-D.1(a)(5)(vii)(B) through payment in lieu of procurement."Alternative compliance payment rate." A rate expressed in dollars per megawatt-hour determined by the department annually by doubling the estimated average levelized cost of electricity from solar photovoltaic technology, as published by the United States Energy Information Administration's most recent Annual Energy Outlook."Clean firm energy." Energy derived from nuclear energy, hydroelectric power, including pumped storage, geothermal energy, fuel cells, solar energy, including solar energy paired with storage resources, wind energy, including wind energy paired with storage resources, clean hydrogen-fueled energy generation, battery energy storage systems and long-duration storage resources that meet all of the following:(1) The resource is dispatchable or capable of providing firm service so that the resource can deliver electricity on demand with an availability factor consistent with standards established by the commission.(2) The resource constitutes incremental capacity, including any of the following:(i) Placement in service of a new clean firm energy generation facility on or after January 1, 2025.(ii) An uprate or efficiency improvement at an existing clean firm energy generation facility completed on or after January 1, 2025, that increases accredited 20260HB2650PN3683 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 capacity or net output.(iii) Placement in service of a battery energy storage system on or after January 1, 2025, that provides at least two hours of continuous discharge, or another duration determined by the commission to provide reliable capacity value.(iv) Placement in service of a long-duration storage resource on or after January 1, 2025, that provides not less than four hours of continuous discharge capability and firm service as determined by the commission."Clean firm energy generation." Electricity generated from clean firm energy. The term does not include a battery energy storage system or long-duration storage resource. The term includes solar energy paired with storage resources and wind energy paired with storage resources."Clean hydrogen-fueled energy generation." Hydrogen produced through a process with a life cycle greenhouse gas emissions rate of less than four kilograms of carbon dioxide equivalent per kilogram of hydrogen."Commission." The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission."Common parent." The most senior corporation owning or controlling a unitary business that includes an owner or operator."Computer data center." All or part of a facility that may be composed of one or more businesses, owners or tenants, that is or will be predominantly used to house working servers or similar data storage systems and that may have uninterruptible energy supply or generator backup power, or both CLOSED-LOOP cooling systems, towers and other temperature control infrastructure.20260HB2650PN3683 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Computer data center equipment." Equipment located on the same land parcel as the computer data center that is used to outfit, operate or benefit a computer data center and component parts, installations, refreshments, replacements and upgrades to the equipment, notwithstanding whether any of the equipment is affixed to or incorporated into real property, including:(1) Equipment necessary for the transformation, generation, distribution or management of electricity that is required to operate computer servers or similar data storage equipment, including battery energy storage devices, uninterruptible energy supplies, conduit, gaseous fuel piping, cabling, duct banks, switches, switchboards, batteries and testing equipment.(2) Equipment necessary to cool and maintain a controlled environment for the operation of the computer servers or data storage systems and other components of the computer data center, including mechanical equipment, refrigerant piping, gaseous fuel piping, adiabatic and free cooling systems, cooling towers, water softeners, air handling units, indoor direct exchange units, fans, ducting and filters.(3) Water conservation systems, including facilities or mechanisms that are designed to collect, conserve and reuse water.(4) Software, including enabling software and licensing agreements, computer servers or similar data storage equipment, chassis, networking equipment, switches, racks, cabling, trays and conduits.(5) Monitoring equipment and security systems.(6) Modular data centers and preassembled components of 20260HB2650PN3683 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any item described in this definition, including components used in the manufacturing of modular data centers.(7) Other tangible personal property that is essential to the operations of a computer data center."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Environmental justice community." A geographic area characterized by increased pollution burden and vulnerable populations based on demographic, economic, health and environmental data and duly identified by the Department of Environmental Protection."Facility." One or more parcels of land located in this Commonwealth and any structures and personal property contained on the land."GRID." The Governor's Responsible Infrastructure Development."Incremental capacity." Additional capacity or additional net energy output from an energy resource in an amount determined based on the unforced capacity value assigned to the resource under PJM's applicable capacity accreditation rules that meets all of the following:(1) Results from the placement in service of a new resource on or after January 1, 2025.(2) Results from an uprate or efficiency improvement completed on or after January 1, 2025, at an existing clean firm energy generation resource or long-duration storage resource, to the extent that the improvement increases accredited capacity or net output available to the grid.(3) For a battery energy storage system or long-duration storage resource, results from the installation of new storage equipment or the expansion or repowering of an 20260HB2650PN3683 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 existing storage facility completed on or after January 1, 2025, that increases discharge duration, rated capacity or firm service capability.(4) Is verified and certified by the commission as representing additional accredited capacity or additional net energy output that would not have been available to the bulk electric system in this Commonwealth absent the investment identified under paragraph (1), (2) or (3)."Locational deliverability area." A geographic area within the PJM region that has limited transmission capability to import capacity to satisfy such area's reliability requirement as specified in Reliability Assurance Agreement, Schedule 10.1. PJM Intra-PJM Tariffs, OATT, Definitions - L - M - N, 19.0.0 as accepted by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission docketed at ER20-646-000 and any updated Federal Emergency Regulatory Commission docketed schedule."New investment." Construction, expansion or build out of data center space at either a new or an existing computer data center on or after the effective date of this section, and the purchase and installation of computer data center equipment, except for items described under paragraph (4) of the definition of computer data center equipment."Owner or operator." The term includes a single entity, multiple entities or affiliated entities that own or operate a computer data center."PEDA." The Pennsylvania Energy Development Authority."Pennsylvania climate change connectivity." A geographic area recognized as important for wildlife habitat connectivity identified by the Pennsylvania Game Commission Wildlife Action Plan Conservation Opportunity Area Tool.20260HB2650PN3683 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "PJM Interconnection, L.L.C." or "PJM." The regional transmission organization approved by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission to coordinate wholesale electricity markets and transmission operations within a geographic region."Proof of work crypto-asset mining." The process of performing computations to add a valid block of data to a blockchain, excluding computations required to validate individual transactions, typically in exchange for a reward or fee."Qualification period." Any of the following:(1) With respect to the owner or operator of a computer data center certified under this article, a period of time beginning on the date of tax exemption certification of the computer data center and expiring at the end of the tenth full calendar year following the calendar year in which the owner or operator filed an application for certification.(2) With respect to a qualified tenant of the owner or operator of a computer data center certified under this article, a period of time beginning on the date that the qualified tenant enters into an agreement concerning the use or occupancy of the computer data center and expiring at the earlier of the expiration of the term of the agreement or the end of the tenth full calendar year following the calendar year in which the qualified tenant enters into the agreement."Qualified tenant." An entity that contracts with the owner or operator of a computer data center that is certified under this article to use or occupy part of the computer data center for at least 100 kilowatts per month for two or more years."Solar ready." A structure that allows for solar photovoltaic panels to be installed on at least 40% of the roof 20260HB2650PN3683 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 area, including preinstalled conduit, and provides sufficient space to install inverters and other necessary equipment."Tax exemption." The tax exemption provided under section 2905-D.1."Telecommunications provider." A provider of telecommunications services as defined in 61 Pa. Code § 60.20 (relating to telecommunications service)."Tenant." An entity that contracts with the owner or operator of a computer data center to use or occupy part of the computer data center."Tier 4 equivalent." A combination of an electrical generator and an engine mounted together to form a single piece of equipment, equipped with all of the following:(1) A selective catalytic reduction system or equivalent for nitrogen oxides control.(2) A diesel oxidation catalyst system or equivalent for carbon monoxide control.(3) A diesel particulate filter or equivalent for particulate matter control."Unitary business." A single economic enterprise that is made up either of separate parts of a single business entity or of a commonly controlled group of business entities that are sufficiently interdependent, integrated and interrelated through their activities so as to provide a synergy and mutual benefit that produces a sharing or exchange of value among them and a significant flow of value to the separate parts."Viewshed." The geographical area of a landscape or environment that is visible from one or more specific vantage points.Section 2903-D.1. Application for GRID certification.20260HB2650PN3683 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Contents.--To be considered for GRID certification, the owner or operator of a data center shall submit to the department an application on a form prescribed by the department that includes all of the following:(1) The owner or operator's name, address and telephone number.(2) The address of the site where the proposed data center will be located including, if applicable, information sufficient to identify a specific portion of a facility comprising the data center.(3) The name of the common parent of any unitary business that will:(i) be responsible for management and operation of the GRID project on a permanent basis after the facility commences commercial operation; or(ii) utilize at least 50% of the facility's capacity.(4) Building size in square feet and campus acreage.(5) An energy plan that includes all of the following:(i) Expected energy generation or storage facilities that will be co-located with the GRID project, if any.(ii) Percent of electricity used from nonemitting sources and an explanation of how the electricity will be procured.(iii) Expected average annual power usage effectiveness.(vi) Expected heat reuse at a connected or co-located facility.(vii) A plan detailing the owner or operator's plan to build, bring or buy incremental capacity including:20260HB2650PN3683 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) sufficient electricity to meet its full energy demands from incremental capacity located within the same PJM locational deliverability area as the proposed GRID project, or if the incremental capacity is not located within the same PJM locational deliverability area as the GRID project, submit documentation to demonstrate that the new generation or storage resource is deliverable to the GRID project and incremental to existing supply, through contracts, interconnection or other verifiable means, consistent with PJM and utility tariff structures; and(B) electricity procured from incremental clean firm energy resources located within this Commonwealth in an amount not less than the following percentages of the GRID project's annual electricity consumption:(I) Beginning January 1, 2027, and ending January 1, 2030, 10%.(II) Beginning January 1, 2030, and ending January 1, 2035, 14.5%.(III) Beginning January 1, 2035, 32%.(IV) A GRID project that does not procure incremental clean firm energy sufficient to satisfy the required amounts under subclause (I), (II) or (III) in a given year shall make an alternative compliance payment to PEDA.(viii) As follows:(A) A commitment to pay, through base rates, surcharges or other ratemaking mechanisms, costs 20260HB2650PN3683 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 caused in whole or in part by the interconnection, service or load of a GRID project, including costs associated with emergency ancillary services, transmission, distribution, network upgrades or dedicated facilities if:(I) the costs are directly attributable to the provision of electric service to the GRID project; or(II) the costs would not have been incurred but for the electricity demand of the GRID project.(B) Compliance with this subparagraph may be demonstrated if a GRID project presents a copy of its Electronic Service Agreement, showing that it purchases electricity from an electric distribution company under an electric service tariff with terms:(I) no less stringent than those detailed in the commission's final Large Load Customer Model Tariff (Docket M-2025-3054271); and(II) further addressing the GRID project facility's contributions to embedded system costs.(ix) Submittal of filings to the commission and adherence to commission regulations governing commercial data centers.(x) Design and construction of a GRID project facility with a floor area exceeding 100,000 square feet in a solar ready manner that facilitates and optimizes the installation of solar photovoltaic panels on unoccupied roof area of the building or other areas of 20260HB2650PN3683 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the building.(6) A community outreach plan that includes all of the following:(i) A commitment to notify and consult with the public in the area in which the GRID project will be located by:(A) holding publicly accessible meetings;(B) consulting with municipal leaders in the host jurisdiction and potentially affected adjoining jurisdictions during GRID project development; and(C) accepting public comments on design decisions including viewshed impact mitigation, noise impact mitigation and building façade design.(ii) A detailed timeline and number of planned publicly accessible meetings in the jurisdiction in which the GRID project will be located that the owner or operator will hold to inform the public about the GRID project in addition to any public meeting required by law.(7) A community benefit plan including a commitment to do all of the following:(i) Make at least $250,000,000 of cumulative new investment.(ii) Create at least 200 jobs during the construction phase of development, each paying the applicable prevailing minimum wage and benefit rates as determined for each applicable craft or classification by the Department of Labor and Industry under act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.20260HB2650PN3683 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Create 50 new jobs each paying at least 125% of Pennsylvania's average Statewide wage on or before the fourth anniversary of GRID certification.(iv) Pay annual compensation of at least $1,500,000 to employees employed full time at the GRID project site for each year of the certification after the fourth anniversary.(v) Provide a hiring plan for recruiting and training local workers, including local workforce participation in site preparation and site construction, and use registered apprenticeship programs and skilled construction labor.(vi) Engage in good faith discussions with the jurisdiction in which the GRID project will be located to develop a community benefit agreement that addresses the following:(A) Detail about planned development phases.(B) Noise, vibration and lighting study requirements and mitigation techniques.(C) A traffic study.(D) Air quality protection requirements consistent with Federal and State law.(E) A plan for addressing aesthetic concerns, including landscaping or visual buffers.(F) An emergency management plan that addresses training, coordination and reasonable resource needs of the emergency management professionals and first responders responsible for the jurisdiction in which the GRID project will be located.(G) Financial contributions toward local 20260HB2650PN3683 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 priorities.(H) Annual reporting to the jurisdiction in which the GRID project will be located addressing community benefit agreement progress.(I) Other items as determined by the jurisdiction in which the GRID project will be located.(8) A REGIONAL BENEFITS PLAN, INCLUDING A COMMITMENT TO DO ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) IDENTIFY THE REGIONAL IMPACT AREA, WHICH SHALL INCLUDE ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(A) EACH MUNICIPALITY LOCATED WITHIN A 25-MILE RADIUS OF THE GRID PROJECT.(B) EACH COUNTY LOCATED WITHIN A 25-MILE RADIUS OF THE GRID PROJECT.(C) ANY SCHOOL DISTRICT, EMERGENCY SERVICE PROVIDER OR WATER, SEWER OR TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY LOCATED WITHIN A 25-MILE RADIUS OF THE GRID PROJECT WHOSE INFRASTRUCTURE OR SERVICE AREA IS REASONABLY EXPECTED TO BE AFFECTED BY THE GRID PROJECT.(II) PROVIDE DOCUMENTATION THAT THE OWNER OR OPERATOR WILL DELIVER WRITTEN NOTICE TO EACH POLITICAL SUBDIVISION AND PUBLIC AUTHORITY IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) AND OFFER AT LEAST ONE INFORMATIONAL MEETING TO EACH ENTITY FOR THE PURPOSE OF RECEIVING COMMENTS ON ANTICIPATED REGIONAL IMPACTS.(III) SUMMARIZE EXPECTED REGIONAL IMPACTS, INCLUDING TRAFFIC, EMERGENCY SERVICES, WATER AND WASTEWATER USE, STORM WATER, AIR QUALITY AND NOISE, BASED ON STUDIES PREPARED FOR THE COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT UNDER 20260HB2650PN3683 - 15 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PARAGRAPH (7).(IV) DESCRIBE SPECIFIC MITIGATION ACTIONS THE OWNER OR OPERATOR WILL UNDERTAKE TO ADDRESS REGIONAL IMPACTS IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III). MITIGATION ACTIONS MAY INCLUDE:(A) TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENTS LOCATED OUTSIDE THE HOST JURISDICTION.(B) SUPPORT FOR COUNTY LEVEL EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PLANNING.(C) REGIONAL AIR QUALITY MONITORING OR ENVIRONMENTAL RESTORATION.(D) WATERSHED OR STORM WATER IMPROVEMENTS.(E) OTHER COMMITMENTS IDENTIFIED DURING CONSULTATION WITH REGIONAL AUTHORITIES.(V) PROVIDE FINANCIAL CONTRIBUTIONS TO SUPPORT PROJECTS OR SERVICES THAT PRODUCE MEASURABLE BENEFITS WITHIN THE REGIONAL IMPACT AREA. CONTRIBUTIONS MAY BE MADE DIRECTLY TO AFFECTED MUNICIPALITIES, SCHOOL DISTRICTS, EMERGENCY SERVICE PROVIDERS OR PUBLIC AUTHORITIES.(8) (9) A sustainability plan that includes all of the following:(i) Details regarding how the owner or operator will deploy best available technology to limit water and energy consumption by the data center by obtaining certification under a recognized performance-based facility standard system or systems applicable to data centers addressing energy and water use as adopted by the department.(ii) A commitment to minimize local air pollutants 20260HB2650PN3683 - 16 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by doing all of the following:(A) Utilizing a backup energy system that relies on zero-emission energy generation or storage or backup generators with emissions equal to or less than the emissions achieved by a Tier 4 or Tier 4 equivalent generator.(B) Implementing operational practices such as reduced generator runtime and limits on backup generation utilization to emergency use and limited testing and maintenance consistent with Federal and State air quality laws and regulations.(C) Including at least three air quality monitors at the site providing continuous record of the air quality.(D) Creating a detailed plan for recordkeeping of the air quality, which shall be made available to government or private entities upon request.(iii) For GRID projects located in an area identified as Pennsylvania climate change connectivity, an explanation of defined measures to minimize and ameliorate impacts to wildlife habitat or offset net loss of habitat and ecological function and a commitment that the owner or operator shall make good faith efforts to fund and collaborate with private conservation and public resource entities to support the monitoring of impacts to land, water and biological resources.(iv) (A) For GRID projects located in an environmental justice community, including an explanation of defined measures to offset any increased environmental exposures or net 20260HB2650PN3683 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 environmental effects and making good faith efforts to fund and collaborate with municipal, civic and private industries to positively impact the population characteristics of the environmental justice community.(B) The good faith efforts made under clause (A) may incorporate the commitments and plans required for the application.(9) (10) A water plan that includes all of the following:(i) Estimated average annual water consumption.(ii) Anticipated maximum daily water demand.(iii) Source of water to be utilized, including the water quality standard use designation under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 93 (relating to water quality standards) of the source of water, if any.(iv) Expected average annual water usage effectiveness.(v) Waste or treated water discharges, if any.(vi) Whether the facility will utilize a closed-loop or open evaporative cooling system.(vii) A commitment to not adversely impact the quantity or quality of water for other uses or users, includi ng designated and existing uses under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 93.(I) ANTICIPATED WASTE OR TREATED WATER DISCHARGES, IF ANY.(II) ESTIMATED AVERAGE ANNUAL WATER CONSUMPTION.(III) ANTICIPATED MAXIMUM DAILY WATER DEMAND.(IV) SOURCE OF WATER TO BE UTILIZED, INCLUDING THE 20260HB2650PN3683 - 18 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 WATER QUALITY STANDARD USE DESIGNATION UNDER 25 PA. CODE CH. 93 (RELATING TO WATER QUALITY STANDARDS) OF THE SOURCE OF WATER, IF ANY.(V) EXPECTED AVERAGE ANNUAL WATER USAGE EFFECTIVENESS.(VI) A COMMITMENT TO UTILIZE THE BEST AVAILABLE TECHNOLOGIES AND OTHER EFFICIENCY MEASURES TO MITIGATE IMPACTS TO THE QUANTITY OR QUALITY OF WATER FOR OTHER USES OR USERS, INCLUDING DESIGNATED AND EXISTING USES UNDER 25 PA. CODE CH. 93.(VII) FOR GRID PROJECTS THAT HAVE A PHYSICAL FOOTPRINT, POINT SOURCE OF WATER WITHDRAWAL OR POINT SOURCE OF STORM WATER DISCHARGE LOCATED WITHIN A WATERSHED DESIGNATED AS HIGH QUALITY WATERS UNDER 25 PA. CODE CH. 93, THE WATERSHED OF A DESIGNATED PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM SOURCE UNDER 25 PA. CODE CH. 109 (RELATING TO SAFE DRINKING WATER) OR 1,000 FEET OF A TRIBUTARY WHICH FLOWS INTO A PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM SOURCE UNDER 25 PA. CODE CH. 109, A HYDROGEOLOGICAL STUDY SHALL BE SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT. THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(A) THE HYDROGEOLOGICAL STUDY SHALL INCLUDE:(I) AN ASSESSMENT OF BASELINE WATER QUALITY AT ALL RELEVANT TRIBUTARY MONITORING POINTS.(II) CONSUMPTIVE USE AND STORM WATER DISCHARGE ON BOTH SURFACE WATER AND GROUNDWATER SOURCES.(III) IDENTIFICATION OF SPECIFIC MITIGATION MEASURES TO PROTECT WATER SOURCES.(B) THE STUDY SHALL BE PREPARED BY A PROFESSIONAL GEOLOGIST WITH RELEVANT EXPERIENCE IN 20260HB2650PN3683 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 HYDROGEOLOGICAL ANALYSIS AND LICENSED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TRANSMIT THE STUDY TO THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION WITHIN 10 DAYS OF RECEIPT OF THE STUDY.(D) THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION SHALL HAVE 45 DAYS TO REVIEW THE STUDY AND PROVIDE WRITTEN COMMENTS TO THE DEPARTMENT ON WHETHER THE STUDY WAS CONDUCTED IN A SATISFACTORY MANNER.(E) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT ISSUE A GRID CERTIFICATION TO GRID PROJECTS LOCATED IN A WATERSHED DESIGNATED AS EXCEPTIONAL VALUE WATERS UNDER 25 PA. CODE CH. 93.(VIII) IF THE GRID PROJECT IS WITHIN THE JURISDICTION OF A RIVER BASIN COMMISSION, DOCUMENTATION THAT THE OWNER OR OPERATOR HAS RECEIVED APPROVAL FOR WATER WITHDRAWAL FROM THE RELEVANT RIVER BASIN COMMISSION.(IX) IF THE GRID PROJECT HAS A PHYSICAL FOOTPRINT, POINT OF SOURCE OF WATER WITHDRAWAL OR POINT OF SOURCE OF STORM WATER DISCHARGE LOCATED WITHIN AN AREA DESCRIBED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (VII), THE OWNER OR OPERATOR SHALL COMMIT TO PERFORMING BASELINE WATER QUALITY MONITORING AT THE APPLICABLE TRIBUTARY POINTS UTILIZED FOR WATER WITHDRAWAL OR DISCHARGE, AS APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, PRIOR TO THE COMMENCEMENT OF CONSTRUCTION AND ANY GROUND DISTURBANCE. THE COMMITMENT UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING:(A) UPON THE COMMENCEMENT OF COMMERCIAL OPERATIONS, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR SHALL SUBMIT ANNUAL 20260HB2650PN3683 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 WATER QUALITY REPORTING DATA FROM THE APPROVED TRIBUTARY POINTS TO THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION FOR REVIEW.(B) UPON REVIEW OF THE ANNUAL REPORTING DATA, THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION MAY REQUIRE CORRECTIVE ACTION IF THE REPORT IDENTIFIES MATERIAL DEGRADATION OF THE WATER SOURCE AT THE APPLICABLE TRIBUTARY POINTS.(C) IF THE MATERIAL DEGRADATION OF THE WATER SOURCE IS NOT CORRECTED BY THE OWNER OR OPERATOR TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVOKE A GRID CERTIFICATION OF A COMPUTER DATA CENTER ISSUED UNDER THIS ARTICLE.(11) A NOISE AND VIBRATION MITIGATION PLAN THAT INCLUDES ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) DOCUMENTATION THAT THE GRID PROJECT WILL COMPLY WITH AN APPLICABLE LOCAL LAW, ORDINANCE OR REGULATION RELATING TO SOUND OR VIBRATION LIMITS, INCLUDING A REQUIRED PERMIT, STUDY OR CERTIFICATION DEMONSTRATING COMPLIANCE.(II) IF THE JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE GRID PROJECT WILL BE LOCATED DOES NOT HAVE AN APPLICABLE ZONING ORDINANCE RELATING TO NOISE OR VIBRATION STANDARDS, A DESCRIPTION OF THE MITIGATION MEASURES THAT THE OWNER OR OPERATOR WILL TAKE TO MITIGATE NOISE AND VIBRATION IMPACTS ON THE SURROUNDING COMMUNITY. THE DESCRIPTION SHALL INCLUDE ANY OF THE FOLLOWING DESIGNED TO MINIMIZE NOISE IMPACTS:(A) OPERATIONAL PRACTICES.20260HB2650PN3683 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) ENGINEERING CONTROLS.(C) MONITORING ACTIVITIES.(b) Acceptance.--The department shall begin accepting applications for GRID certification no later than 30 days after the effective date of this section.Section 2904-D.1. Review of applications.After receiving a complete and correct application for GRID certification under section 2903-D.1, the department shall review the application and issue a written certification that the computer data center qualifies for the GRID certification or provide written reasons for its denial.Section 2905-D.1. Tax exemption.(a) Exemption.--The tax imposed under Article II shall not be imposed upon the sale at retail or use of computer data center equipment purchased for installation in a GRID certified computer data center, if purchased by any of the following:(1) An owner or operator of a computer data center certified under this article.(2) A qualified tenant of a computer data center certified under this article.(b) Exemption period.--A tax exemption approved under this article shall apply during the qualification period.(c) Exclusions.--The following shall not qualify for a tax exemption:(1) A telecommunications provider's computer data center that does not have retail or wholesale customers being billed or paying for services and that provides a majority of services for internal use or use by the telecommunications provider's subsidiaries.(2) Computer data center equipment used by the certified 20260HB2650PN3683 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 computer data center for any of the following purposes:(i) Generating electricity for resale purposes to a power utility.(ii) Generating, providing or selling more than 5% of its electricity outside of the certified computer data center.(iii) Proof of work for crypto-asset mining as determined by the department.(3) Any item of tangible personal property for use both inside and outside the computer data center.(4) Primary electric generation equipment.Section 2906-D.1. GRID ready report.(a) Requirement.--Prior to commencing commercial operations, a GRID project must submit a GRID ready report, verified by a qualified third-party entity, to the department for review providing updated information regarding any material change to any item required in the application for GRID certification under section 2903-D.1 and must specifically report or provide:(1) Confirmation that any changes to the energy plan have not imposed additional costs on other utility ratepayers.(2) Confirmation that it has fully implemented its community outreach plan.(3) Confirmation that it has made the cumulative new investments and created the jobs required in its community benefit plan, including its executed community benefit agreement.(4) The status of compliance with its sustainability plan commitments.(5) The status of compliance with its water plan 20260HB2650PN3683 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commitments.(6) CONFIRMATION THAT IT HAS SUBMITTED ALL DOCUMENTATION REQUIRED UNDER ITS NOISE AND VIBRATION MITIGATION PLAN AND, IF APPLICABLE, THE STATUS OF COMPLIANCE WITH THE MITIGATION MEASURES SPECIFIED UNDER SECTION 2903-D.1(A)(11)(II).(7) CONFIRMATION THAT ITS REGIONAL BENEFITS PLAN HAS BEEN FULLY IMPLEMENTED.(b) Failure to meet commitments.-- If EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SECTION 2909-D.1(E), IF the department determines that the commitments of section 2903-D.1 have not been satisfied, the department shall revoke the GRID certification of a computer data center.Section 2907-D.1. Annual reporting.(a) Requirement.--The owner or operator of a computer data center certified under this article must file on an annual basis with the department, on a form prescribed by the department, a report verified by a qualified third-party entity, including all of the following:(1) Documentation that the computer data center is continuing to meet the conditions in its application filed under section 2903-D.1.(2) The amount and source of water used by the computer data center and a certification that its water use has not adversely impacted the quantity or quality of water for other uses or users including designated and existing uses under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 93 (relating to water quality standards).(3) The amount of electricity used by the computer data center.(4) The total amount of sales or use tax exempted under this article.20260HB2650PN3683 - 24 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) AN ANNUAL CERTIFICATION SIGNED BY AN OFFICER OF THE OWNER OR OPERATOR THAT IDENTIFIES WHETHER THE OWNER OR OPERATOR COMPLETED EACH COMMITMENT CONTAINED IN THE COMMUNITY BENEFIT PLAN REQUIRED UNDER SECTION 2903-D.1(A)(7) DURING THE PRECEDING YEAR AND, IF NOT, IDENTIFIES EACH COMMITMENT THAT REMAINS IN PROGRESS AND THE STEPS THE OWNER OR OPERATOR IS TAKING TO COMPLETE EACH COMMITMENT.(5) (6) Any other information required by the department.(b) Fourth anniversary.--On or before the fourth anniversary of GRID certification, the owner or operator or qualified tenant of a computer data center must show that it met the requirements of section 2903-D.1(a)(6)(i).(C) PUBLIC POSTING.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE THE INFORMATION SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(5) AVAILABLE ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL WITHHOLD FROM PUBLIC DISCLOSURE PROPRIETARY INFORMATION CONSISTENT WITH SECTION 2911-D.1.(D) MUNICIPAL COMMENTS.--A MUNICIPALITY IN WHICH A GRID PROJECT IS LOCATED, OR A MUNICIPALITY OR PUBLIC AUTHORITY LOCATED WITHIN 25 MILES OF THE GRID PROJECT, MAY SUBMIT WRITTEN COMMENTS TO THE DEPARTMENT IF THE MUNICIPALITY OR PUBLIC AUTHORITY HAS REASON TO BELIEVE THAT THE OWNER OR OPERATOR IS NOT SATISFYING ONE OR MORE COMMITMENTS CONTAINED IN THE COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW THE COMMENTS AND, AS NECESSARY, REQUEST ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FROM THE OWNER OR OPERATOR TO EVALUATE COMPLIANCE . Section 2908-D.1. Compliance.(a) Reporting.--An owner or operator or qualified tenant eligible for GRID certification shall comply with reporting, 20260HB2650PN3683 - 25 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 filing and compliance requirements under this act.(b) Tax laws.--An owner, operator or qualified tenant may not receive a certification under this article unless the owner, operator or qualified tenant is in full compliance with State tax laws.Section 2909-D.1. Revocation of certification.(a) Revocation.-- If EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (E), IF the department determines that the requirements of this article have not been satisfied, the department shall revoke a GRID certification of a computer data center issued under this article.(b) Appeal.--The owner or operator of the computer data center may appeal a GRID certification revocation. Appeals filed under this section shall be governed by Article II.(c) Recapture.--If a GRID certification is revoked under this section, the qualification period of any owner or operator or qualified tenant of the computer data center shall expire and the department shall recapture from the owner or operator or qualified tenant all or part of the tax exemption received by the owner or operator or qualified tenant under this article. The department may give special consideration or allow a temporary exemption from recapture of the tax exemption if there is extraordinary hardship due to factors beyond the control of the owner or operator or qualified tenant. The department may require the owner or operator or qualified tenant to file appropriate amended tax returns in order to reflect any recapture of the tax exemption.(d) Limitation on assessment.--Notwithstanding the limitation on assessment and collection in section 258, the department shall assess any tax determined not to be properly 20260HB2650PN3683 - 26 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 exempted under this article within five years from the date an owner or operator or qualified tenant of a computer data center purchases property exempt from a tax. A taxpayer may consent to an extension of the period as set forth in section 261.(E) CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN.--BEFORE THE DEPARTMENT REVOKES A GRID CERTIFICATION ON THE BASIS THAT AN OWNER OR OPERATOR FAILED TO COMPLY WITH A COMMUNITY BENEFIT COMMITMENT UNDER SECTION 2903-D.1(A)(7), THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE OWNER OR OPERATOR THAT IDENTIFIES THE DEFICIENCY AND PROVIDES THE OWNER OR OPERATOR WITH NOT LESS THAN 60 DAYS TO SUBMIT AND IMPLEMENT A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN TO ADDRESS THE DEFICIENCY. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVOKE THE GRID CERTIFICATION IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE OWNER OR OPERATOR FAILED TO SUBMIT OR IMPLEMENT THE CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN OR FAILED TO ADDRESS THE DEFICIENCY UNDER THE CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN.Section 2910-D.1. Regulations, implementation and guidelines.(a) Authority.--The department may promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this part.(b) Temporary regulations.--(1) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this article, the department may promulgate temporary regulations that shall expire no later than three years following the publication of the temporary regulations. The department may promulgate temporary regulations not subject to:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the 20260HB2650PN3683 - 27 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(2) The department's authority to adopt temporary regulations under paragraph (1) shall expire three years after the effective date of this section. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law.(c) Implementation and guidelines.--The department shall work with other agencies and offices as necessary to implement this article and publish written guidelines and prescribe forms and procedures as necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.Section 2911-D.1. Confidential information.Notwithstanding section 731 of the act of act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, or the confidentiality provisions of this act, information contained in the application form described under section 2903-D.1 and any report required under sections 2906-D.1 and 2907-D.1, including information concerning the identity of a qualified tenant, shall be public. An applicant may request that trade secret, confidential proprietary information or information which creates a reasonable likelihood of endangering the applicant, as defined in section 102 and 708(b)(3) of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, be withheld from disclosure. Disclosure shall be at the discretion of the department.Section 2912-D.1. Maintenance of records.20260HB2650PN3683 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Duties.--The owner or operator or qualified tenant shall:(1) Maintain detailed records of investments created by the computer data center, including costs of buildings and computer data center equipment and tax exemptions received by the owner or operator or qualified tenant.(2) Maintain purchase journals for examination by the department.(b) Retention.--The records required under subsection (a) shall be kept available at all times for inspection by authorized personnel of the department and shall be retained if the contents of the records may become material in the administration of this article.Section 2913-D.1. List of tenants.An owner or operator of a certified computer data center shall provide, to the extent permissible under Federal law, the department with a list of qualified tenants, including the commencement and expiration dates of each qualified tenant's agreement to use or occupy part of the GRID certified computer data center. The list shall be provided to the department annually and upon request by the department.Section 2914-D.1. Sale or transfer.Except as provided under section 2908-D.1, a computer data center shall retain its GRID certification notwithstanding a transfer, sale or other disposition, directly or indirectly, of the computer data center.Section 2915-D.1. Certificate of exemption.(a) Application.--An owner or operator or qualified tenant of a computer data center certified under this article may apply for a sales and use tax GRID certificate of exemption in a 20260HB2650PN3683 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 manner prescribed by the department on or before October 1, 2027, and renew each October 1 thereafter.(b) Notification.--No later than 60 days after receipt of a correct and complete application under subsection (a) for a sales and use tax GRID certificate of exemption, the department shall issue a sales and use tax GRID certificate of exemption to each applicant approved by the department.(c) Exempt purchases.--The owner or operator or qualified tenant of a certified computer data center shall prepare and deliver a properly executed sales and use tax certificate of exemption to a vendor from which the owner or operator or qualified tenant purchases exempt computer data center equipment.(d) Continued compliance.--(1) The owner or operator or qualified tenant of a GRID certified computer data center eligible for a sales and use tax GRID certificate of exemption shall comply with the reporting, filing and compliance requirements under this article.(2) An owner, operator or qualified tenant may not receive a sales and use tax GRID certificate of exemption under this article unless the owner, operator or qualified tenant is in full compliance with State tax laws.Section 2916-D.1. Limitation.(a) Prohibition.--The department may not certify any computer data center under this article after December 31, 2032.(b) Eligibility.--Except if certified under Article XXIX-D prior to February 3, 2026, a data center shall not be eligible for tax benefits associated with Article XIX-B, Article XVIII-C or the act of October 6, 1998 (P.L.705, No.92), known as the 20260HB2650PN3683 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Keystone Opportunity Zone, Keystone Opportunity Expansion Zone and Keystone Opportunity Improvement Zone Act.Section 2917-D.1. Zoning.Nothing in this article shall affect the zoning authority of a municipality.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2650PN3683 - 31 - 123456